Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-1309
Nebraska Broadband Bridge Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Nebraska Broadband Bridge Fund is created. The fund shall consist of money appropriated by the Legislature and federal funds designated by the Governor for broadband enhancement purposes. The commission shall administer the fund and use the fund to finance grants for qualifying projects under the Nebraska Broadband Bridge Act and for expenses of the commission as appropriated by the Legislature for administering the fund.

(2) Any money in the Nebraska Broadband Bridge Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2021, LB388, § 9;

Laws 2023, LB683, § 27.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.